src/morphology/lexicon.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Albanian language
! Copyright © 2015 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
! !!            !!!Albanian morphological analyser                      !
! ========================================================================== !
!! INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF Albanian LANGUAGE.
 

Multichar_Symbols  !!≈ !!!Definitions for @CODE@

!! !!Analysis symbols
!  ----------------
!! The morphological analyses of wordforms for the Albanian
!! language are presented in this system in terms of the following symbols.
!! (It is highly suggested to follow existing standards when adding new tags).

!! The parts-of-speech are:
 +N +A +Adv +V                                 !!≈
 +Pron +CS +CC +Adp +Po +Pr +Interj +Pcle +Num !!≈

!! The parts of speech are further split up into:
 +Prop +Pers +Dem +Interr +Refl +Recipr +Rel +Indef

!! The Usage extents are marked using following tags:
 +Err/Orth   
 +Use/-Spell 

!! The nominals are inflected in the following Case and Number
 +Sg +Du +Pl
 +Ess +Nom +Gen +Acc +Ill +Loc +Com +Com/Sh

!! The possession is marked as such:
 +PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3 +PxDu1 +PxDu2 +PxDu3 +PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3
!! The comparative forms are:
 +Comp +Superl
!! Numerals are classified under:
 +Attr +Card
 +Ord 
!! Verb moods are:
 +Ind +Prs +Prt +Pot +Cond +Imprt
!! Verb personal forms are:
 +Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3 +Du1 +Du2 +Du3 +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3
!! Other verb forms are
 +Inf +Ger +ConNeg +ConNegII +Neg +ImprtII +PrsPrc +PrfPrc +Sup +VGen +VAbess

! Abbreviated words are classified with:
 +ABBR +ACR 
!! Special symbols are classified with:
+CLB +PUNCT +LEFT +RIGHT
!! The verbs are syntactically split according to transitivity:
 +TV +IV
!! Special multiword units are analysed with:
 +Multi
!! Non-dictionary words can be recognised with:
 +Guess

!! Question and Focus particles:
 +Qst +Foc


!! Semantics are classified with
 +Mal +Fem +Sur 
 +Plc 
 +Org
 +Obj
 +Ani
 +Hum
 +Plant
 +Group
 +Time 
 +Txt
 +Route
 +Measr 
 +Wthr
 +Build 
 +Edu
 +Veh
 +Clth


!! Derivations are classified under the morphophonetic form of the suffix, the
!! source and target part-of-speech.
 +V→N +V→V +V→A
 +Der/xxx


!! Morphophonology
!  ---------------
!! To represent phonologic variations in word forms we use the following
!! symbols in the lexicon files:
 {aä} {oö} {uü}

!! And following triggers to control variation
 {front} {back}

!! !!Flag diacritics
!! We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
!! flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
!! with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@    !!≈ | @CODE@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
 @D.NeedNoun.ON@    !!≈ | @CODE@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
 @C.NeedNoun@       !!≈ | @CODE@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
!! 
!! For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
!! to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
!! handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
!! do no harm.
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ !!≈ | @CODE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
 @D.CmpPref.TRUE@  !!≈ | @CODE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
 @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ !!≈ | @CODE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
 @D.CmpLast.TRUE@  !!≈ | @CODE@ | Block such words from entering R
 @D.CmpNone.TRUE@  !!≈ | @CODE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
 @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ !!≈ | @CODE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
 @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@  !!≈ | @CODE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
 @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ !!≈ | @CODE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.
!! 
!! Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
!! nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
!! these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
!! given the proper use of these flags.
 @U.Cap.Obl@        !!≈ | @CODE@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
 @U.Cap.Opt@        !!≈ | @CODE@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

LEXICON Root
!! The word forms in UNDEFINED language start from the lexeme roots of basic
!! word classes, or optionally from prefixes:
0   Nouns       ;
0   Verbs       ;
0   Adjectives  ;
0   Pronouns    ;
0   Numerals    ;
0   Prefixes    ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Adjective inflection
!  --------------------
!! The UNDEFINED language adjectives compare.

LEXICON Comparisons
+A+pos:0        #   ;
+A+cmp:er       #   ;
+A+sup:est      #   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The UNDEFINED language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON mi
+N+Msc+Sg+Indef: # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Def:%>i # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Indef:%>e # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Def:%>et # ;

LEXICON mu
+N+Msc+Sg+Indef: # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Def:%>u # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Indef:%>j # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Def:%>jtë # ;

LEXICON f
+N+Fem+Sg+Indef: # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Def:%>a # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Indef:%>a # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Def:%>at # ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Proper noun inflection
!  ----------------------
!! The UNDEFINED language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON ProperNounCases
+N+Prop:%:   #  ;
+N+Prop:%:   #  ;
+N+Prop:%:   #  ;
+N+Prop:%:   #  ;
+N+Prop:%:   #  ;
+N+Prop:%:   #  ;
        -    Nouns  ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! The UNDEFINED language verbs inflect in persons.

LEXICON Persons
+V+1sg:en   #   ;
+V+2sg:et   #   ;
+V+3sg:e    #   ;
+V+1pl:ien  #   ;
+V+2pl:iet  #   ;
+V+3pl:iet  #   ;
+V+inf:0    #   ;
#:0   Nouns   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Adjectives
!  ----------
!! Adjectives in UNDEFINED language describe things.

LEXICON Adjectives
adjective    Comparisons   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Nouns
!  -----
!! Nouns in UNDEFINED language are things.

LEXICON Nouns
mal mi "mountain"  ; !masc pl i
zog mu "bird" ; !masc pl u
vajzë f "girl" ; !fem

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Numerals
!  --------
!! Numerals in UNDEFINED language are numbers.

LEXICON Numerals
numeral    #  ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Prefixes
!  --------
!! Prefixes in UNDEFINED language are bound to beginning of other words.

LEXICON Prefixes
nounprefix-     Nouns   ;
verbprefix-     Verbs   ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Pronouns
!  --------
!! Pronouns in UNDEFINED language are references to things.

LEXICON Pronouns
pronoun    #   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

LEXICON Punctuation

! Clause boundary symbols:
    %,+CLB:%,     # ;
    %.+CLB:%.     # ;
  %.%.+CLB:%.%.   # ;
%.%.%.+CLB:%.%.%. # ;
    %:+CLB:%:     # ;
    %;+CLB:%;     # ;
 ^excl+CLB:%!     # ;
 ^pipe+CLB:%|     # ;
    %?+CLB:%?     # ; ! Question mark
     …+CLB:…      # ;
     ¿+CLB:¿      # ; ! Only seen as noise.
     ¶+CLB:¶      # ; ! This sign is for titles, it is introduced by the
                      ! catxml script, and may be changed if it interferes 
                      ! with real pilcrow signs.

! Miscellaneous symbols, abbreviation symbols (could be moved to abbr-sme-lex.txt) 
  
 §+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:§ PUNCTconnector ;    ! §:s	!
 §§+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:§§ PUNCTconnector ;  ! §:ain	!
 $+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:$  PUNCTconnector ;    ! $:s	!
 €+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:€  PUNCTconnector ;    ! €:s	!
 £+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:£  PUNCTconnector ;    ! €:s	!
®+N+ABBR:® # ;
©+N+ABBR:© # ;

! Single punctuation marks

  •+PUNCT:•   # ;
  ●+PUNCT:●   # ;
  ·+PUNCT:·   # ;
   ּ+PUNCT:ּ    # ;
  ·+PUNCT:·   # ;
  -+PUNCT:-   # ; ! hyphen
 --+PUNCT:--  # ; ! double hyphen
  –+PUNCT:–   # ; ! endash
  —+PUNCT:—   # ; ! emdash
  ―+PUNCT:―   # ; ! horizontal bar
  =+PUNCT:=   # ;
  ≈+PUNCT:≈   # ;
 %%+PUNCT:%%  # ;
  &+PUNCT:&   # ;
 %"+PUNCT:%"  # ;
  '+PUNCT:'7  # ; ! We use "'7" to avoid the CG symbol of ái'gi etc.
 %*+PUNCT:%*  # ;
  ++PUNCT:+   # ;
  ±+PUNCT:±   # ;
  `+PUNCT:`   # ;
  ´+PUNCT:´   # ;
  /+PUNCT:/   # ; 
+/-+PUNCT:+/- # ;
 %~+PUNCT:%~  # ;

! Paired punctuation marks

  «+PUNCT+LEFT:«7     # ;
  »+PUNCT+RIGHT:»7    # ;
 %“+PUNCT+LEFT:%“     # ;
 %”+PUNCT+RIGHT:%”    # ;
 %‘+PUNCT+LEFT:%‘     # ;
 %’+PUNCT+RIGHT:%’    # ;
 %„+PUNCT+LEFT:%„     # ;
 %‹+PUNCT+LEFT:%‹     # ;
 %›+PUNCT+RIGHT:%›    # ;
 %(+PUNCT+LEFT:%(     # ;
 %)+PUNCT+RIGHT:%)    # ;
 %[+PUNCT+LEFT:%[     # ;
 %]+PUNCT+RIGHT:%]    # ;
 %{+PUNCT+LEFT:%{     # ;
 %}+PUNCT+RIGHT:%}    # ;
 %<+PUNCT+LEFT:%[%<%] # ;
 %>+PUNCT+LEFT:%[%>%] # ;



LEXICON PUNCTconnector    !^C^
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Circ: # ;	! §       !
!+Sg+Gen: # ;	! §       !^C^
!+Sg+Acc: # ;	! §       !^C^
 +Use/Sub+Use/Circ: PUNCTsuff ;		! §as              ! !
 +Use/Circ:%: PUNCTsuff ;	! §:s                   !
 +Use/Sub+Use/Circ:%- PUNCTsuff ;	! §-as  ! Perhaps. ! !
 +Use/Sub+Use/Circ:%' PUNCTsuff ;	! §'as  ! Perhaps. ! !
 
LEXICON PUNCTsuff
! # ;		! § 14 (no case on the bare §). Oh, yes. Case.
 +Sg+Gen: # ;	! §    (case suffix on the rest, in case of explicit
 +Sg+Acc: # ;	!       suffix)
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a # ;	! §:a  (case suffix on the rest, in case of explicit  !
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:a # ;	!       suffix)                                       !
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:ij # ;  !       !
 +Sg+Ill:i # ;   !
 +Sg+Loc:s # ;   ! §:s
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:as # ;  ! §:as  !
+Sg+Com:in # ;
   +Ess:n # ;
 +Ess+Use/Sub:an # ;          !
+Pl+Nom:t # ;
+Pl+Gen:id # ;
+Pl+Acc:id # ;
+Pl+Ill:ide # ;
+Pl+Loc:in # ;
+Pl+Com:igujn # ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:at # ;     !
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ajd # ;    !
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ajd # ;    !
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ajde # ;   !
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:ajn # ;    !
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:ajgujn # ; !


! Todo: Some symbols from non-ISO code pages do not work

!+PUNCT:"\150" # ; ! trying to capture some hyphens
!+PUNCT:"\151" # ; ! trying to capture some hyphens
! Did not work.

!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in UNDEFINED language are actions.

LEXICON Verbs
verb    Persons   ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
